Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.230

Reports.

At least once a year, an authority shall file with the clerk a report of its activities for the preceding year, and shall make recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other action as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.82.230. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 24; RRS s 6889-24. Formerly RCW 74.24.230.]